Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-277
Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner the district court may decree dissolution of a limited partnership whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 45.